Wyoming statutes. Title 3 Guardian and Ward
Article 4. Foreign Conservators

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

39 Am. Jur. 2d Guardian and Ward §§ 258 to 261.

§ 3-3-401.
Appointment of ancillary or foreign guardians or conservators.

When there is no conservatorship, nor any petition therefor pending in this state, a duly qualified foreign conservator or guardian of a nonresident ward may, upon application, be appointed conservator of the property of the person in this state. For good cause shown, the court may appoint a resident conservator to act jointly with a foreign conservator.

When a resident ward has a nonresident guardian or conservator, the guardian or conservator shall:

File a certified copy of the order establishing the guardianship or conservatorship;

Obtain an order from a Wyoming court appointing him an ancillary guardian or conservator of the ward for as long as the ward is a resident of this state and the person remains the duly appointed guardian or conservator in the other state.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1; 1998, ch. 114, § 2.

§ 3-3-402.
Petition.

The petition for appointment of a foreign or ancillary conservator or guardian as conservator in this state shall include:

The names and addresses of the nonresident ward and of the nonresident conservator or guardian;

The name and address of the resident conservator;

A certified copy of the letters of conservatorship or of guardianship issued to the foreign conservator or guardian;

A certified copy of the bond of the foreign conservator or guardian or a certified copy of the order appointing the foreign conservator or guardian showing that no bond was required;

The description and estimated value of the nonresident ward’s property in this state; and

The name and address of the person in possession of the property in this state belonging to the nonresident ward.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1; 1998, ch. 114, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 3-3-403.
Personal property.

The court of the county where the nonresident ward has personal property may authorize the foreign conservator or guardian of a nonresident ward to receive the property upon compliance with the provisions of W.S.

2-11-301

through

2-11-303

.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1; 2000, ch. 48, § 2.

§ 3-3-404.
Filing of bond.

The court may require the foreign or ancillary conservator or guardian to file a bond satisfactory to the court. The foreign or ancillary conservator or guardian shall file with the clerk of court his bond as required by the court of this state.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1; 1998, ch. 114, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to bond of guardian generally, see §

3-1-106

.

As to bond of guardian appointed under Uniform Veterans Guardianship Act, see §

3-6-109

.

§ 3-3-405.
Order for delivery.

Upon the filing of the bond required by the court of this state the court shall order the personal property of the nonresident ward delivered to the foreign conservator or guardian. The foreign conservator or guardian shall execute and file with the court a receipt itemizing the property of the nonresident ward received by him.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

§ 3-3-406.
Recording of bond; notice to court.

The clerk shall mail to the court which granted the foreign letters of conservatorship or of guardianship copies of:

The letters of conservatorship or guardianship issued by the Wyoming court;

The bond filed with the Wyoming court; and

The receipt of the foreign conservator or guardian itemizing property delivered to and received by the foreign conservator or guardian and showing date of delivery.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 226, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.